Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4869.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1701b. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, the legislature shall appropriate not less than $2,600,000,000.00 each fiscal year for the purpose of providing special education services to pupils as described in sections 51a, 51c, 51d, 51e, 53a, 54, and 56 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1651a, 388.1651c, 388.1651d, 388.1651e, 388.1653a, 388.1654, and 388.1656.